Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
CHAPTER 10 Sale or Possession of Distilled Spirits in Dry Counties and Municipalities

Cross references.

Special elections in counties and municipalities pertaining to prohibition of package sale of distilled spirits, §

3-4-40

et seq.

3-10-1.
Scope of chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 3-10-11, this chapter shall only be applicable within counties or municipalities in which the sale of distilled spirits is not lawful.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 2; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-7101, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1605, § 1.

3-10-2.
Sale, exchange, or other possession of distilled spirits.

It is unlawful for any person knowingly and intentionally to sell, offer for sale, keep for sale, barter, exchange, furnish at public places, keep on hand at a place of business, or otherwise possess distilled spirits in any quantity, except as provided in this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1915, Ex. Sess., p. 77, § 2; Ga. L. 1917, Ex. Sess., p. 7, § 23; Code 1933, § 58-102; Code 1933, § 5A-7102, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-10-3.
Keeping of distilled spirits in building not exclusively used for dwelling deemed prima-facie evidence of possession for sale or distribution.

The keeping of distilled spirits in any building not exclusively used for a dwelling shall be prima-facie evidence that they are kept for sale or with intent to dispose of same contrary to this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1915, Ex. Sess., p. 77, § 7; Code 1933, § 58-107; Code 1933, § 5A-7109, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-10-4.
Quantities of distilled spirits which may be lawfully possessed.

It is not unlawful for any person to have and possess, for use and not for sale, in any county or municipality within the state, one standard case of 1.75 liter, liter, or 750 milliliter size containers of distilled spirits, but not more than eight individual containers of distilled spirits of a size of 200 milliliters or four individual containers of distilled spirits of a size of 500 milliliters, which may have been purchased by the person for use and consumption from a lawful and authorized retailer and properly stamped.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 23B; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1715, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 5A-7105, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 61.

3-10-5.
Allowing use of premises for unlawful sale, manufacture, or other disposition of distilled spirits.

It is unlawful for any person to permit the use of any premises which he owns or controls for the unlawful sale, manufacture, or other unlawful disposition of distilled spirits.

History.

Ga. L. 1915, Ex. Sess., p. 77, § 5; Code 1933, § 58-105; Code 1933, § 5A-7103, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-10-6.
Forfeiture of rights of lessee or tenant where unlawful act performed upon premises with lessee’s or tenant’s knowledge or permission.

The unlawful manufacture, sale, or keeping for sale or disposition of any distilled spirits shall work, at the option of the landlord, a forfeiture of the rights of any lessee or tenant under any lease or contract for rent of the premises where the unlawful act is performed by the lessee or tenant or by any agent, servant, clerk, or employee of the lessee or tenant with the latter’s knowledge or permission.

History.

Ga. L. 1915, Ex. Sess., p. 77, § 6; Code 1933, § 58-106; Code 1933, § 5A-7108, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

Cross references.

Landlord and tenant relationship generally, T. 44, C. 7.

3-10-7.
Transportation or shipment of distilled spirits for sale or use
in violation of title; exceptions for possession for personal use and transportation through counties or municipalities.

It is unlawful for any person knowingly and intentionally to transport, ship, or carry from any point outside this state to any point within this state or from place to place within this state any distilled spirits intended by any person interested in such beverages to be received, possessed, sold, or in any manner used in violation of this title.

It is not unlawful for any person to transport, ship, carry, or possess distilled spirits in any county or municipality when the beverages are in the amounts specified by Code Section 3-10-4 and are intended for personal use and not for sale.

It is not unlawful for any licensed wholesaler, importer, or common carrier to transport, ship, or carry any distilled spirits through any county or municipality where the destination of the beverages is beyond the respective jurisdictional boundaries of the county or municipality and such destination is within a county or municipality in which the sale of distilled spirits has been authorized. The commissioner may issue a permit to any person to transport, ship, or carry distilled spirits pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, Ex. Sess., p. 7, § 1; Code 1933, § 58-201; Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, §§ 16, 27; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, §§ 7, 11; Code 1933, § 5A-7104, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 60.

3-10-8.
Common nuisances — Defined; institution of quo warranto proceedings against clubs or associations maintaining nuisances.

The following are declared to be common nuisances and may be abated or enjoined as such upon complaint of the Attorney General, or the district attorney of the superior court, or any citizen of the county where the common nuisance is located:

Any place used for the unlawful manufacture, sale, barter, keeping for sale, or other unlawful disposition of distilled spirits;

Any place where distilled spirits are sold, bartered, kept for sale, or otherwise disposed of, for consumption on or near the premises;

Any resort or public eating place where distilled spirits are sold, served, or consumed; and

Any club or other place in which distilled spirits are received or kept for the purpose of sale, barter, use, storage, gift, consumption, or for distribution or division among, or to be furnished to, the membership of any club or association of persons.

Any club or association of persons chartered or incorporated under the laws of this state, which club or association violates any provision of this Code section or maintains or keeps any place as described in this Code section shall forfeit its charter. The forfeiture may be declared by proceedings in quo warranto against the club or incorporated association in a court of competent jurisdiction in the county where the unlawful act is committed.

History.

Ga. L. 1915, Ex. Sess., p. 77, §§ 4, 9; Code 1933, §§ 58-104, 58-109; Code 1933, § 5A-7106, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

Cross references.

Abatement of nuisances generally, T. 41, C. 2.

3-10-9.
Common nuisances — Proceedings for abatement of nuisances.

Any common nuisance as defined in Code Section 3-10-8 shall be an unlawful place, and the act of keeping and maintaining any such place shall be deemed a separate offense for each day that it continues. Common nuisances may be abated by writ of injunction issued out of the superior court upon a complaint filed by the Attorney General, or the district attorney of the superior court, or any citizen of the county in which the nuisance exists. The complaint shall be filed in the county in which the nuisance exists.

History.

Ga. L. 1915, Ex. Sess., p. 77, § 4; Code 1933, § 58-104; Code 1933, § 5A-7107, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-10-10.
Existence of property rights in distilled spirits or vessels kept or used in violation of chapter; contraband.

No property rights of any kind shall exist in distilled spirits or in the vessels kept or used for the purpose of violating this chapter, or in any such liquors when received, possessed, or stored at any forbidden place or anywhere in a quantity forbidden by law or when kept, stored, or deposited for the purpose of sale or unlawful disposition, furnishing, or distribution. In all such cases the distilled spirits, the vessels and receptacles in which the distilled spirits are contained, and any property kept or used for the purpose of violating this chapter are declared to be contraband and are to be forfeited to the state when seized in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 16 of Title 9.

History.

Ga. L. 1915, Ex. Sess., p. 77, § 20; Code 1933, § 58-122; Code 1933, § 5A-7112, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-1/HB 233.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).

3-10-11.
Contraband apparatus and appliances; existence of property rights therein; summary destruction of contraband; governing procedure for forfeiture of vehicles, boats, and vessels.

All apparatus or appliances which are used for the unlawful purpose of distilling or manufacturing any distilled spirits are declared to be contraband.

No person shall have any property right in or to the contraband specified in this subsection.

Whenever apparatus or appliances used or about to be used for the unlawful purpose of manufacturing, using, holding, or containing any distilled spirits are found or discovered by any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or other law enforcement officer of this state, the same shall be summarily destroyed and rendered useless by him or her without any formal order of the court.

All vehicles and conveyances of every kind and description in this state and all boats and vessels of every kind and description in any of the waters of this state used in conveying, removing, concealing, or storing any distilled spirits, the transportation, possession, or storing of which is in violation of law, are declared to be contraband and shall be seized by any law enforcement officer. Such contraband shall be subject to forfeiture in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 16 of Title 9, including those counties and municipalities in which the sale of distilled spirits is lawful.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, Ex. Sess., p. 7, § 20; Ga. L. 1924, p. 198, § 1; Code 1933, § 58-207; Ga. L. 1946, p. 96, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 632, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-7113, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 62; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1605, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-2/HB 233.

Cross references.

Disposition of property seized, T. 17, C. 5, A. 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).

3-10-12.
Raw materials or substances, fixtures, implements, or apparatus used or intended for use in unlawful distillation or manufacture of distilled spirits declared contraband; property rights in contraband; governing procedures for seizure and forfeiture.

Any raw materials or substances, including, but not limited to, sugar of any grade or type, and any fixture, implement, or apparatus used or intended for use in the unlawful distilling or manufacturing of any distilled spirits are declared to be contraband.

No person shall have any property right in or to any contraband specified in subsection (a) of this Code section.

Whenever any item used or about to be used as specified in subsection (a) of this Code section is found or discovered, whether in transit, in storage, or at a site of unlawful distillation or manufacture, by any law enforcement officer, it shall be subject to the following dispositions:

When found or discovered at a site of unlawful distillation or manufacture, it may be summarily destroyed and rendered useless by any law enforcement officer without any formal order of the court or, in the event any of the raw materials or substances are fit for human consumption or if any of the fixtures, implements, or apparatus are of any beneficial use to the educational authorities of the county for use in any of their educational programs, they may be delivered to the public schools of the county in which seized for use in the schools. When any of the foregoing items are delivered to a public school system, the officer delivering the items shall obtain from the appropriate school authorities an itemized receipt detailing all items delivered to the system and report such information as provided in subsection (g) of Code Section 9-16-19. In the event any of the foregoing items are destroyed by a law enforcement officer, the officer shall execute an affidavit of such fact in which all items destroyed shall be listed. The receipts and affidavits shall be maintained by the officer and shall be open to inspection by the public upon request; or

When found or discovered in transit or in storage by any law enforcement officer, the items shall be seized by the officer and forfeited in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 16 of Title 9.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 722, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1051, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-7114, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 63; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-3/HB 233.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).

3-10-13.
Duties of district attorneys as to investigation and prosecution of violations of chapter; duties of sheriffs.

Any district attorney in a county may commence prosecution on his own affidavit against any party violating any provision of this chapter. The district attorney, upon receiving information giving him probable cause to believe that there has been a violation of this chapter, shall lay the matter before the grand jury or institute a criminal prosecution against the party by affidavit before a court or judge of competent jurisdiction, if the district attorney is willing and able to make the affidavit for the institution of a criminal prosecution. If he is not willing or able to make the affidavit and any citizen is willing to make an affidavit for the institution of a criminal prosecution against any party for the violation, the district attorney shall superintend the preparation of the papers and the institution of the prosecution, provided the district attorney is of the opinion upon the facts at hand that there is reasonable ground to believe that a conviction ought to be had.

Sheriffs are charged with the duty of enforcing this chapter and cooperating with the district attorneys.

History.

Ga. L. 1915, Ex. Sess., p. 77, § 18; Code 1933, § 58-120; Code 1933, § 5A-7110, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-10-14.
Evidence as to color, odor, appearance, and taste of beverage manufactured, sold, or disposed of by defendant; burden of proof when defendant claims beverage not a distilled spirit.

In all prosecutions against any persons for manufacturing, selling, offering for sale, keeping, or having or otherwise disposing of distilled spirits, it shall be competent for the state to give in evidence the fact that the beverage which the evidence may tend to show the defendant had manufactured, sold, bartered, exchanged, furnished, given away, or otherwise disposed of, possessed or possesses the same color, odor, and general appearance or the same taste, color, and general appearance of a distilled spirit.

The fact that a beverage in question is of the same color, odor, and general appearance or of the same taste, color, and general appearance as a distilled spirit shall constitute prima-facie evidence that the beverage is a distilled spirit.

If the defendant claims the beverage in question is not a distilled spirit even though it possesses the same color, odor, and general appearance or the same taste, color, and general appearance as a distilled spirit, the burden of proof shall be upon the defendant to establish to the reasonable satisfaction of the judge, court, or jury trying the case that the beverage in question is not a distilled spirit and that it is a beverage which is not prohibited by law to be manufactured, sold, offered for sale, or otherwise disposed of.

The rule of evidence provided in this Code section shall be applicable in all cases for the abatement of liquor nuisances and in all prosecutions for violations of this chapter when it becomes necessary to determine whether the beverage is a distilled spirit.

History.

Ga. L. 1915, Ex. Sess., p. 77, § 19; Code 1933, § 58-121; Code 1933, § 5A-7111, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

Cross references.

Abatement of nuisances generally, T. 41, C. 2.

3-10-15.
Penalty for violations of provisions of chapter.

It is unlawful for any person knowingly and intentionally to violate any prohibition contained in this chapter relating to provisions applicable only in dry political subdivisions.

Any person who violates any prohibition contained in this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1915, Ex. Sess., p. 77, § 23; Code 1933, § 58-123; Code 1933, § 5A-9903, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.